West Virginia, session 2025, HB2244.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of Health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16-2H-2 of this code, relating to the Department of Health (Primary Care Support Program, 64 CSR 70), is authorized.